Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4174.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. The Department of Justice shall study public records. The department shall
submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations
for legislation, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to the judiciary
no later than September 15, 2027.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2026 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.

NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 177